Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.290

Deposit of cash received by personal representative of escheat estate.

All cash received by the personal representative of an escheat estate shall be immediately deposited at interest for the benefit of the estate in a federally insured time or savings deposit or share account, except that the personal representative may maintain an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars in a checking account. This arrangement may be changed by appropriate court order.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 209 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—1979 ex.s. c 209: See note following RCW 11.08.210.